California statutes. Public Contract Code
(e) A county or public entity that elects to proceed under this section and uses a construction manager at-risk contract for a building project shall make a copy of the contract available for public inspection on its internet website and notify the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature with instructions on finding and accessing the stored contract.

(f) (1) If the county or public entity elects to award a project pursuant to this section, retention proceeds withheld by the county or public entity from the construction manager at-risk entity shall not exceed 5 percent if a performance and payment bond issued by an admitted surety insurer is required in the solicitation of bids.

(2) In a contract between the construction manager at-risk entity and any subcontractor, and in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld shall not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the county or public entity and the construction manager at-risk entity. If the construction manager at-risk entity provides written notice to any subcontractor that is not a member of the construction manager at-risk entity, before or at the time the bid is requested, that a bond may be required and the subcontractor subsequently
 is unable or refuses to furnish a bond to the construction manager at-risk entity, then the construction manager at-risk entity may withhold retention proceeds in excess of the percentage specified in the contract between the county or public entity and the construction manager at-risk entity from any payment made by the construction manager at-risk entity to the subcontractor.

(g) If the county or public entity elects to award a project pursuant to this section, the contract between the county or public entity and the construction manager at-risk entity shall be subject to subdivision (b) of Section 2782 of the Civil Code. Any contract between the construction manager at-risk entity and a contractor or subcontractor shall be subject to Section 2782.05 of the Civil Code.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is
 repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 167.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

20147.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, this article shall not apply to a contract entered into by the County of San Diego with a private entity for the delivery of a regional communications system and any related infrastructure to be used by public safety agencies and emergency responders located in the Counties of Imperial and San Diego.

(b) The County of San Diego may use any competitive procurement method to procure the regional communications systems and related infrastructure described in subdivision (a), provided that if the County of San Diego does not use a procurement method otherwise available to it under this article, the procurement shall be a best value procurement. “Best value” means a value
 determined by evaluation of objective criteria related to price, functional specifications and features, technical specifications and features, implementation plan, life-cycle costs and support, experience, past performance, and fiscal stability. A best value determination may entail selection of the lowest priced technically acceptable proposal or selection of the best proposal for a fixed price established by the procuring agency, or it may consist of a tradeoff between price and other specified factors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 45, Sec. 1.   (AB 2149)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.6. Counties of 500,000 or Less Population [20150. - 20150.14.]

20150.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by counties of 500,000 or less population as provided for in Part 2 (commencing with Section 25000) of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), every county, whether general law or charter, containing a population of less than 500,000 shall employ bidding procedures on public projects as provided in this article. This article shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes. In the event of conflict with any other provision of law relative to bidding procedures, the provisions of this article shall apply.

(b) Every county, whether general law or charter, containing a population of less than 500,000 is authorized to participate in the Uniform Public Construction Cost Accounting Act under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22000) of Part 3 of
 Division 2.

(c) A county, whether general law or charter, containing a population of less than 500,000 may award individual annual contracts as provided in Section 20128.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 269, Sec. 22.   (SB 184)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.2.

As used in this article, “public project” means:

(a) A project for the erection, improvement, and repair of public buildings and works.

(b) Work in or about streams, bays, waterfronts, embankments, or other work for protection against overflow, except maintenance, repair, or reconstruction work.

(c) Supplies and materials used in maintenance, repair, or reconstruction work in or about streams, bays, waterfronts, embankments; or other maintenance, repair, or reconstruction work for protection against overflow.

The provisions of this article shall not change existing law regarding inclusion or exclusion of labor or materials used for completion of the project.

Except for the erection, improvement and repair of public buildings, the construction of dams, reservoirs, powerplants and electrical transmission lines of 230,000 volts and higher, nothing in this article shall apply to a publicly owned water, power or waste disposal system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.3.

Expenditures for public projects shall not include the costs of:

(a) Equipment, supplies and materials acquired by a public agency to enable the timely completion of a public project as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 20150.2 let to a contractor.

(b) Plans, specifications, engineering and advertising required for public projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.4.

Public projects between four thousand dollars ($4,000) and ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be let to contract by informal or formal bidding procedures.

Public projects of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and more shall, in all instances, be let to contract by formal bidding procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.5.

Each county shall adopt ordinances or regulations providing for formal and informal bidding procedures as required by this article for public projects conducted by such county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.6.

Ordinances or regulations establishing informal bidding procedures shall provide that the county shall, as soon as is practicable after the time for the renewal of contractors’ licenses, notify each contractor of the county of the opportunity to register with the county to be subsequently notified of informal bidding proceedings. The list of such contractors shall be a public record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.7.

The notice inviting informal bids shall be by published notice and may, in addition, be supplemented by mailed notice to contractors registered pursuant to Section 20150.6. The county may cause the notice to be printed as display advertising in such form and style as it deems appropriate. The notice shall describe in general terms the project to be done and state a closing date for submission of such informal bids. Publication of notice pursuant to this section shall be in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the jurisdiction of the county, or, if there is no such newspaper within the jurisdiction of the county, publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation which is circulated in the jurisdiction of the county, or, if there is no such publication, the notice shall be posted in at least three public places within the jurisdiction of the county as have been designated by ordinance or regulation of such county as places for the posting of its notices. Notice shall be published in accordance with Section 6061 of the Government Code and shall be completed at least 24 hours before the time scheduled for opening of the bids.

In addition to notice published in a newspaper of general circulation, mailed, or posted, pursuant to this section, the county may also publish notice inviting bids in a trade publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.8.

The notices inviting formal bids shall state the time and place for the receiving and opening of sealed bids and distinctly state the project to be done. The first publication or posting of the notice shall be at least 10 days before the date of opening the bids. Notice shall be published at least twice, not less than five days apart, in a newspaper of general circulation, printed and published in the jurisdiction of the county, or, if there is no such newspaper within the jurisdiction of the county, publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation which is circulated in the jurisdiction of the county, or, if there is no such publication, the notice shall be posted in at least three public places within the jurisdiction of the county as have been designated by ordinance or regulation of such county as places for the posting of its notices.

In addition to notice published in a newspaper of general circulation, mailed, or posted, pursuant to this section, the county may also publish notice inviting bids in a trade publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.9.

In its discretion, the county may reject any bids presented. If, after the first invitation for bids, all bids are rejected, after reevaluating its cost estimates of the project, the county shall abandon the project or shall readvertise for bids in the manner prescribed by this article. If after readvertising, the county rejects all bids presented, the county may proceed with the project by use of county personnel or may readvertise. If two or more bids are the same and the lowest, the county may accept the one it chooses. If no bids are received, the county may have the project done without further complying with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.10.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 20150.9, on any project which is less than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), if, after the first invitation for bids, all bids are rejected, the county may, after reevaluating its cost estimates of the project, pass a resolution by a four-fifths vote of its board of supervisors declaring that the project can be performed more economically by county personnel, or that in its opinion a contract to perform the project can be negotiated with the original bidders at a lower price than that in any of the bids, or the materials or supplies furnished at a lower price in the open market. Upon adoption of the resolution, it may have the project done in the manner stated without further complying with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 694, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.11.

It shall be unlawful to split or separate into smaller work orders or projects any public project for the purpose of evading the provisions of this article requiring public projects to be done by contract after bidding. Every person who willfully violates this provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.12.

The board of supervisors of the county shall adopt plans, specifications, and working details for all public projects the expenditure for which exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.13.

All bidders on public projects which exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in cost, shall be afforded the opportunity to examine the plans, specifications, and working details for the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

20150.14.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to the construction of any public building used for facilities of juvenile forestry camps or juvenile homes, ranches, or camps established under Article 15 (commencing with Section 880) of Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, if a major portion of the construction work is to be performed by wards of the juvenile court assigned to such camps, ranches, or homes; or to public projects employing prisoners pursuant to Section 25359 of the Government Code and public projects involving persons engaged in federal, state, or county job or work training programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 82.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.7. Best Value Construction Contracting for Counties [20155. - 20155.9.]

20155.

(a) This article provides for a best value procurement program for county construction projects in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(b) The board of supervisors of a county shall let any contract for a construction project pursuant to this article to the bidder representing the best value or else reject all bids.

(c) The bidder may be selected on the basis of the best value to the county. In order to implement this method of selection, the board of supervisors shall adopt and publish procedures and required criteria that ensure that all selections are conducted in a fair and impartial manner. These
 procedures shall conform to Sections 20155.3 to 20155.6, inclusive, and shall be mandatory for a county that chooses to participate in the pilot program.

(d) If the board of supervisors of a county deems it to be in the best interest of the county, the board of supervisors, on the refusal or failure of the successful bidder for a project to execute a tendered contract, may award it to the bidder with the second lowest best value score, as determined in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 20155.5. If the second bidder fails or refuses to execute the contract, the board of supervisors may likewise award it to the bidder with the third lowest best value score, as determined in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 20155.5.

(e) (1) A county may also use the best value
 construction contracting method set out in this article to award individual annual contracts, which shall not exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000), adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index, for repair, remodeling, or other repetitive work to be done according to unit prices. The contracts shall be based on plans and specifications for typical work. No annual contracts may be awarded for any new construction.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, best value criteria shall be applied to the annual contract for construction services, rather than to an individual, specific project. Annual contracts may be extended or renewed for two subsequent annual terms and a maximum of six million dollars ($6,000,000) over the subsequent two terms of the contract. Contract values shall be adjusted annually
 to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “unit price” means the amount paid for a single unit of an item of work, and “typical work” means a work description applicable universally or applicable to a large number of individual projects, as distinguished from work specifically described with respect to an individual project. For purposes of this section, “repair, remodeling, or other repetitive work to be done according to unit prices” shall not include design or contract drawings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 58, Sec. 2.   (AB 1957)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 20155.9.)
-------------------------------------------

20155.1.

As used in this article:

(a) “Best value” means a procurement process whereby the selected bidder may be selected on the basis of objective criteria for evaluating the qualifications of bidders with the resulting selection representing the best combination of price and qualifications.

(b) “Best value contract” means a competitively bid contract entered into pursuant to this article.

(c) “Best value contractor” means a properly licensed person, firm, or corporation that submits a bid for, or is awarded, a best value contract.

(d) “County” means any chartered or general law county. “County” includes a city and county.

(e) “Demonstrated management competency” means the experience, competency, capability, and capacity of the proposed management staffing to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity.

(f) “Financial condition” means the financial resources needed to perform the contract. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s financial condition shall include, at a minimum, capacity to obtain all required payment bonds, performance bonds, and liability insurance.

(g) “Labor compliance” means the ability to comply with, and past performance with, contract and statutory requirements for the payment of wages and
 qualifications of the workforce. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s labor compliance shall include, as a minimum, the bidder’s ability to comply with the apprenticeship requirements of the California Apprenticeship Council and the Department of Industrial Relations, its past conformance with those requirements, and its past conformance with requirements to pay prevailing wages on public works projects.

(h) “Qualifications” means the financial condition, relevant experience, demonstrated management competency, labor compliance, and safety record of the bidder, and, if required by the bidding documents, some or all of the preceding qualifications as they pertain to subcontractors proposed to be used by the bidder for designated portions of the work. A county shall evaluate financial condition, relevant experience, demonstrated management competency,
 labor compliance, and safety record, using, to the extent possible, quantifiable measurements.

(i) “Relevant experience” means the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity.

(j) “Safety record” means the prior history concerning the safe performance of construction contracts. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s safety record shall include, at a minimum, its experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 58, Sec. 3.   (AB 1957)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 20155.9.)
-------------------------------------------

20155.2.

(a) If a county as defined by Section 20155.1 is also responsible for delivery of a project included in Item 2660-110-0042 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2016, as amended by Chapter 7 of the Statutes of 2017, that county may utilize the “cost-plus-time” bidding procedure, also known as “A+B Bidding,” under this chapter for any of the projects specified in that budget item.

(b) “Cost-plus-time bidding” means a competitive procurement process that uses a cost parameter (A) and a time parameter (B) to determine a bid value.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 20, Sec. 7.   (AB 115)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 20155.9.)
-------------------------------------------

20155.3.

A county shall proceed in accordance with the following when awarding best value contracts under this article:

(a) The county shall not select a bidder on the basis of the best value to a county unless, after evaluating at a public meeting the alternative of awarding the contract on the basis of the lowest bid price, the county makes a written finding that awarding the contract on the basis of best value, for the specific project under consideration, will accomplish one or more of the following objectives: reducing project costs, expediting the completion of the project, or providing features not achievable through awarding the contract on the basis of the lowest bid price.

(b) The county shall prepare a solicitation for bids and give notice pursuant to Section 20125. A county may identify specific types of subcontractors that are required to be included in the bids. A county shall comply with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 with regard to construction subcontractors identified in the bid.

(c) The county shall establish a procedure to prequalify bidders pursuant to Section 20101. The information required pursuant to this section shall be verified under oath by the bidder in the manner in which civil pleadings in civil actions are verified. Information submitted by the bidder as part of the evaluation process shall not be open to public inspection to the extent that information is exempt from disclosure under the California Public
 Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(d) Each solicitation for bids shall do all of the following:

(1) Invite prequalified bidders to submit sealed bids in the manner prescribed by this article.

(2) Include a section identifying and describing the following:

(A) Criteria that the county will consider in evaluating bids.

(B) The methodology and rating or weighting system that will be used by the county in evaluating bids.

(C) The relative importance or weight assigned to the criteria identified
 in the request for bids.

(e) Final evaluation of the best value contractor shall be done in a manner that prevents cost or price information from being revealed to the committee evaluating the qualifications of the bidders prior to completion and announcement of that committee’s decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 362.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 20155.9.)
-------------------------------------------

20155.4.

(a) A best value contractor shall not be prequalified or shortlisted unless the contractor provides an enforceable commitment to the county that the contractor and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.

(b) This section shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(1) The county has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or
 contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the contractor agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(2) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the county prior to January 1, 2017.

(3) The contractor has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the contractor and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(c) For purposes of this section, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 774, Sec. 9.   (SB 693)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 20155.9.)
-------------------------------------------

20155.5.

Selection of the best value contractor shall be made as follows:

(a) (1) An evaluation committee appointed by the county shall evaluate the qualifications of the bidders based solely upon the criteria set forth in the solicitation documents, and shall assign a qualifications score to each bid.

(2) A county shall establish written policies and procedures, consistent with applicable law, to ensure that members of an evaluation committee are free from conflicts of interest, if the county has not already established applicable written policies and procedures.

(b) A county shall not award a contract for a construction project pursuant to this article if a solicitation for bids for that construction project results in the submission of fewer than three responsive bids to the county for evaluation. 

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 20155, the award of the contract shall be made to the bidder whose bid is determined by a county, in writing, to be the best value to the county. To determine the best value contractor, the county shall divide each bidder’s price by its qualifications score. The lowest resulting cost per quality point will represent the best value bid.

(d) A county shall issue a written decision of its contract award.

(e) Upon issuance of a contract
 award, a county shall publicly announce its award identifying the best value contractor to which the award is made, the project, the project price, and the selected best value contractor’s score based on the evaluation criteria listed in the request for bids. The notice of award shall be made public and include the score of the selected best value contractor in relation to all other responsive bidders and their respective prices. The contract file shall include documentation sufficient to support the decision to award.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 627, Sec. 2.   (SB 762)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 20155.9.)
-------------------------------------------

20155.6.

(a) If a county elects to award a project pursuant to this article, retention proceeds withheld by the county from the selected best value contractor shall not exceed 5 percent if a performance and payment bond, issued by an admitted surety insurer, is required in the solicitation of bids.

(b) In a contract between the selected best value contractor and a subcontractor, and in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld shall not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the county and the selected best value contractor. If the selected best value contractor provides written
 notice to a subcontractor that, prior to or at the time the bid is requested, a bond may be required and the subcontractor subsequently is unable or refuses to furnish a bond to the selected best value contractor, then the selected best value contractor may withhold retention proceeds in excess of the percentage specified in the contract between the county and the selected best value contractor from any payment made by the selected best value contractor to the subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 627, Sec. 2.   (SB 762)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 20155.9.)
-------------------------------------------

20155.7.

(a) Before March 1, 2029, the board of supervisors of a participating county shall submit a report to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(1) A description of the projects awarded using the best value procedures.

(2) The contract award amounts.

(3) The best value contractors awarded the projects.

(4) A description of any written protests concerning any aspect of the solicitation, bid, or award of the best value contracts, including the resolution of the protests.

(5) A description of the prequalification process.

(6) The criteria used to evaluate the bids, including the weighting of the criteria and an assessment of the effectiveness of the methodology.

(7) If a project awarded under this article has been completed, an assessment of the project performance, to include a summary of any delays or cost increases.

(b) A report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 58, Sec. 4.   (AB 1957)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 20155.9.)
-------------------------------------------

20155.8.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, this article is not intended to change in any manner any guideline, criteria, procedure, or requirement of a county to let any contract for a project to the lowest responsible bidder or else reject all bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 627, Sec. 2.   (SB 762)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 20155.9.)
-------------------------------------------

20155.9.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 58, Sec. 5.   (AB 1957)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    Note: Repeal affects Article 3.7, commencing with Section 20155.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cities [20160. - 20175.]

20160.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts awarded by cities subject to Title 4 (commencing with Section 34000) of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20161.

As used in this chapter, “public project” means:

(a) A project for the erection, improvement, painting, or repair of public buildings and works.

(b) Work in or about streams, bays, waterfronts, embankments, or other work for protection against overflow.

(c) Street or sewer work except maintenance or repair.

(d) Furnishing supplies or materials for any such project, including maintenance or repair of streets or sewers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20162.

When the expenditure required for a public project exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), it shall be contracted for and let to the lowest responsible bidder after notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20163.

It shall be unlawful to split or separate into smaller work orders or projects any public work project for the purpose of evading the provisions of this article requiring public work to be done by contract after competitive bidding. Every person who willfully violates this provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20164.

The notice inviting bids shall set a date for the opening of bids. The first publication or posting of the notice shall be at least 10 days before the date of opening the bids. Notice shall be published at least twice, not less than five days apart, in a newspaper of general circulation, printed and published in the city, or if there is none, it shall be posted in at least three public places in the city that have been designated by ordinance as the places for posting public notices. The notice shall distinctly state the project to be done.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20165.

Any notice inviting bids, which specifies locations of possible materials, such as a borrow pit or gravel bed, for use in the proposed construction project which would be subject to Section 1602 of the Fish and Game Code, shall include any conditions or modifications established pursuant to Section 1603 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 383, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

20166.

In its discretion, the legislative body may reject any bids presented and readvertise. If two or more bids are the same and the lowest, the legislative body may accept the one it chooses. If no bids are received, the legislative body may have the project done without further complying with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20167.

After rejecting bids, the legislative body may pass a resolution by a four-fifths vote of its members declaring that the project can be performed more economically by day labor, or the materials or supplies furnished at a lower price in the open market. Upon adoption of the resolution, it may have the project done in the manner stated without further complying with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20168.

In case of an emergency, the legislative body may pass a resolution by a four-fifths vote of its members declaring that the public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property. Upon adoption of the resolution, it may expend any sum required in the emergency without complying with this chapter. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the legislative body shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20168.5.

In any city that has agreed to permit the transfer of prisoners or parole violators under Section 2910 or 2910.5 of the Penal Code, or of wards under Section 1753.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the city council may contract for the construction or expansion of facilities to be used for that purpose without the formality of obtaining bids, adopting plans and specifications, or complying with other requirements of this article, except as required by this section. The person to whom the contract is awarded shall execute a bond for faithful performance. The award of the contract shall be made after a public hearing on the basis of a request for proposals advertised in accordance with Section 6062 or 6062a of the Government Code. The contract may be awarded only to a contractor who has responded to the request for proposals and who is licensed to do the work in accordance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code. The contract shall be upon terms which the city council determines are necessary for the expeditious completion of the work. A contract shall not be entered into unless at least three proposals to do the work have been evaluated by a competitive process established by the city council and the lowest bid is selected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1450, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

20169.

Annually before the beginning of the fiscal year, in cities where there is more than one newspaper of general circulation printed and published, the legislative body shall publish a notice inviting bids and contract for the publication of legal notices required to be published in such a newspaper. The contract shall include the printing and publishing of all such legal notices during the fiscal year.

If there is only one such newspaper, the legislative body may contract with it without advertising for bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20170.

All bids shall be presented under sealed cover and accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) Cashier’s check made payable to the city.

(c) A certified check made payable to the city.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20171.

The security shall be in an amount equal to at least 10 percent of the amount bid. A bid shall not be considered unless one of the forms of bidder’s security is enclosed with it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20172.

If the successful bidder fails to execute the contract, the amount of the bidder’s security shall be forfeited to the city except as hereinafter provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20173.

The cash or proceeds shall be deposited in the fund out of which the expenses of preparation and printing of the plans and specifications, estimates of cost, and publication of notice are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20174.

The city council may, on refusal or failure of the successful bidder to execute the contract, award it to the next lowest responsible bidder. If the legislative body awards the contract to the second lowest bidder, the amount of the lowest bidder’s security shall be applied by the city to the difference between the low bid and the second lowest bid, and the surplus, if any, shall be returned to the lowest bidder if cash or a check is used, or to the surety on the bidder’s bond if a bond is used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20175.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Elk Grove, with approval of the city council, may utilize construction manager at-risk construction contracts for the city’s zoo project. A construction manager at-risk construction contract may be awarded using either the lowest responsible bidder or best value method to a construction manager at-risk entity that possesses or that obtains sufficient bonding to cover the contract amount for construction services and risk and liability insurance as may be required by the city. Any payment or performance bond written for the purposes of this section shall be written using a bond form developed by the city.

(b) (1) A construction manager at-risk entity shall not be prequalified or
 shortlisted or awarded a contract unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the city that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the zoo project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply if any of the following conditions are met:

(A) The city has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.
